Utah statutes.
9-8-806.   Claiming reposited materials held by a collecting institution.
(1)  Any person claiming title to reposited materials held by a collecting
institution shall demonstrate that he owns all right, title, and interest in
the reposited materials to the reasonable satisfaction of the collecting
institution.
(2) (a)  Any person claiming to represent a person claiming title to reposited
materials held by a collecting institution shall demonstrate, to the
reasonable satisfaction of the collecting institution, that:
(i)  he represents every person who owns any right, title, or interest in the
reposited materials; and
(ii)  the persons he represents own all right, title, and interest in the
reposited materials.
(b)  Any person claiming he represents persons holding all right, title, and
interest in the reposited materials may demonstrate that representation by
providing the collecting institution with a notarized authorization from every
person having any right, title, or interest in the reposited materials.
